Ohio, session 136, HB966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) The Department of Health shall conduct a statewide one-year study on the prevalence of cholestatic liver disorders associated with increased risk of end-stage liver disease among women ages thirty-five through forty-five who are enrolled in the Ohio Medicaid program. During the study, the Department shall collect all of the following information on study participants: (1) Key demographics such as age, genetic predispositions, pre-existing conditions, including autoimmune diseases and metabolic disorders, and lifestyle factors that elevate an individual's risk of developing cholestatic liver disorders; (2) The number or percentage of study participants who, despite being identified as high-risk, do not follow through with medical referrals or treatment recommendations; (3) The number of study participants who avoid referral and follow-up care or otherwise engage in treatment avoidance; (4) Other relevant information or issues identified by the Department related to cholestatic liver disorders associated with increased risk of end-stage liver disease. (B)(1) Upon the conclusion of the one-year study, the Department shall review the collected data and information and compile it into a written report that includes both of the following: (a) Recommendations on how to increase awareness of cholestatic liver disorders, including screenings and genetic testing, and collaborate with patient advocacy groups to raise public awareness through social media, seminars, and community outreach initiatives; (b) An analysis of strategies and funding to increase screening and genetic testing for cholestatic liver disorders. The analysis must include recommendations on how to promote public-private partnerships to ensure sustainable funding for genetic research and testing infrastructure. (2) All information collected and reported through the study shall be handled in accordance with all applicable state and federal privacy laws and regulations. (3) The Department of Health shall submit the report to the General Assembly not later than December 31, 2028, and upon submission the study is concluded.